apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="morm/or__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ødrene</l><r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødrer</l> <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ora</l>   <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ori</l>   <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>    <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
    


<pardef n="h/onk__n">
  <e>       <p><l>enkene</l><r>onk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enker</l> <r>onk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onka</l>  <r>onk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>onki</l>  <r>onk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onk</l>   <r>onk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ad/el__n">
  <e>       <p><l>lane</l>  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lar</l>   <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="royalt/y__n">
  <e>       <p><l>yane</l>  <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ies</l>   <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yar</l>   <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yen</l>   <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>     <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="guinea__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="peso__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cowboy__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jacket__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fan__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="slide__n">
  <e>       <p><l>sane</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="puk/kel__n">
  <e>       <p><l>lane</l>  <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lar</l>   <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kelen</l> <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kel</l>   <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="foreld/er__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ra</l>    <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>    <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eren</l>  <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rett__n">
  <!-- sidan matrett har sideforma -ar unngår me slik wsd-problemet for nb=>nn... -->
  <e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mon__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bustad">          <i>bustad</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
<e lm="rett">            <i>rett</i><par n="rett__n"/></e>
<e lm="heradsrett">      <i>heradsrett</i><par n="rett__n"/></e>
<e lm="forelder">        <i>foreld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="bestemor"><i>bestem</i><par n="morm/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aleineforelder"><i>aleineforeld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="armada"><i>armada</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arveonkel"><i>arveonk</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aurikkel"><i>aurik</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barrel"><i>barrel</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
    <e lm="besteforelder"><i>besteforeld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beta"><i>beta</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bildebibel"><i>bildebib</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bitestikkel"><i>bitestik</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brudevigsel"><i>brudevigs</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bushel"><i>bushel</i><par n="fan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="button"><i>button</i><par n="fan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="c-nøkkel"><i>c-nøk</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centavo"><i>centavo</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centesimo"><i>centesimo</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centimo"><i>centimo</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chinchilla"><i>chinchilla</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="commando"><i>commando</i><par n="jacket__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cowboy"><i>cowboy</i><par n="cowboy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cruzeiro"><i>cruzeiro</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
    <e lm="detaljhandel"><i>detaljhand</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dåsemikkel"><i>dåsemik</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ergometersykkel"><i>ergometersyk</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="escudo"><i>escudo</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
    <e lm="evergreen"><i>evergreen</i><par n="fan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fenad"><i>fenad</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fitting"><i>fitting</i><par n="fan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forbruksartikkel"><i>forbruksartik</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fosterforelder"><i>fosterforeld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fusel"><i>fus</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gobelinvev"><i>gobelinvev</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guinea"><i>guinea</i><par n="guinea__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hankjønnsartikkel"><i>hankjønnsartik</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hesterygg"><i>hesterygg</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="importhandel"><i>importhand</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jacket"><i>jacket</i><par n="jacket__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaldbenk"><i>kaldbenk</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kjørvel"><i>kjørv</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knokkel"><i>knok</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landslott"><i>landslott</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="livsførsel"><i>livsførs</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mahatma"><i>mahatma</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mikkel"><i>mik</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opiumshandel"><i>opiumshand</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pakkrammesekk"><i>pakkrammesekk</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paperback"><i>paperback</i><par n="fan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peseta"><i>peseta</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peso"><i>peso</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
    <e lm="petitartikkel"><i>petitartik</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pint"><i>pint</i><par n="fan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="playback"><i>playback</i><par n="fan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="propellveng"><i>propellveng</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ristel"><i>rist</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="royalty"><i>royalt</i><par n="royalt/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="shilling"><i>shilling</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skjøtsel"><i>skjøts</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrunøkkel"><i>skrunøk</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slide"><i>slide</i><par n="slide__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snunad"><i>snunad</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stapel"><i>stap</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="støvpartikkel"><i>støvpartik</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trudomsartikkel"><i>trudomsartik</i><par n="puk/kel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trygel"><i>tryg</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turistvaluta"><i>turistvaluta</i><par n="mon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veivaksel"><i>veivaks</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yard"><i>yard</i><par n="peso__n"/></e>
